Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Generally

§ 4001.
Slung shot, blackjack, brass knuckles—Use or possession.

A person who uses a slung shot, blackjack, brass knuckles or similar weapon against another person, or attempts so to do, or who possesses a slung shot, blackjack, brass knuckles, or similar weapon, with intent so to use it, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.
The provisions of this section do not apply to a law enforcement officer as to the possession and use of a blackjack, billy club, or night stick.

§ 4002.
Manufacture, sale, etc.

A person within the State who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, or sells or gives away or parts with, or offers so to do, or keeps for sale or gift, a slung shot, blackjack, brass knuckles, or similar weapon, shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $500.00, or both. This section shall not apply to the manufacture of a blackjack, billy club, or nightstick for a law enforcement officer or the sale or gift thereto.

HISTORY:

Amended 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 4003.
Carrying dangerous weapons.

A person who carries a dangerous or deadly weapon with the intent to injure another shall be imprisoned for not more than two years or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both. It shall be a felony punishable by not more than 10 years of imprisonment or a fine of $25,000.00, or both, if the person intends to injure multiple persons.

HISTORY:

Amended 2017, No. 135 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 21, 2018.

§ 4004.
Possession of dangerous or deadly weapon in a school bus or school building or on school property.

No person shall knowingly possess a firearm or a dangerous or deadly weapon while within a school building or on a school bus. A person who violates this section shall, for the first offense, be imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both, and for a second or subsequent offense shall be imprisoned for not more than three years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

No person shall knowingly possess a firearm or a dangerous or deadly weapon on any school property with the intent to injure another person. A person who violates this section shall, for the first offense, be imprisoned for not more than three years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both, and for a second or subsequent offense shall be imprisoned for not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

This section shall not apply to:

A law enforcement officer while engaged in law enforcement duties.

Possession and use of firearms or dangerous or deadly weapons if the board of school directors, or the superintendent or principal if delegated authority to do so by the board, authorizes possession or use for specific occasions or for instructional or other specific purposes.

As used in this section:

“School property” means any property owned by a school, including motor vehicles.

“Owned by the school” means owned, leased, controlled, or subcontracted by the school.

“Dangerous or deadly weapon” shall have the same meaning as in section 4016 of this title.

“Firearm” shall have the same meaning as in section 4016 of this title.

“Law enforcement officer” shall have the same meaning as in section 4016 of this title.

The provisions of this section shall not limit or restrict any prosecution for any other offense, including simple assault or aggravated assault.

HISTORY:

Amended 1989, No. 143 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 1999, No. 113 (Adj. Sess.), § 11; 2017, No. 135 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 21, 2018.

§ 4005.
While committing a crime.

Except as otherwise provided in 18 V.S.A. § 4253, a person who carries a dangerous or deadly weapon, openly or concealed, while committing a felony shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1967, No. 296 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 20, 1968; 2011, No. 121 (Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 9, 2012.

§ 4006.
Record of firearm sales.

All pawnbrokers and retail merchants dealing in firearms shall keep a record book in which they shall record the sale by them of all revolvers and pistols, and the purchase by them of all secondhand revolvers and pistols.
Such record shall include the date of the transaction, the marks of identification of the firearm, including the manufacturer’s name, the caliber, model, and manufacturer’s number of the firearm, the name, address, birthplace, occupation, age, height, weight, and color of eyes and hair of the purchaser or seller.
Such purchaser or seller shall sign his or her name to the record and the pawnbroker or merchant shall preserve such record book for six years after the date of last entry and shall permit all enforcement officers to inspect the same at all reasonable times.
A person, partnership or corporation who violates a provision of this section shall be fined not more than $100.00.

§ 4007.
Furnishing firearms to children.

A person, firm, or corporation, other than a parent or guardian, who sells or furnishes to a minor under the age of 16 years a firearm or other dangerous weapon or ammunition for firearms shall be fined not more than $50.00 nor less than $10.00.
This section shall not apply to an instructor or teacher who furnishes firearms to pupils for instruction and drill.

§ 4008.
Possession of firearms by children.

A child under the age of 16 years shall not, without the consent of his or her parents or guardian, have in his or her possession or control a pistol or revolver constructed or designed for the use of gunpowder or other explosive substance with leaden ball or shot.
A child who violates a provision of this section shall be deemed a delinquent child under the provisions of 33 V.S.A. chapter 52.

§ 4009.
Negligent use of gun.

A person who carelessly or negligently wounds another person by gunshot shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 4010.
Gun suppressors.

As used in this section:

“Gun suppressor” means any device for silencing, muffling, or diminishing the report of a portable firearm, including any combination of parts, designed or redesigned, and intended for use in assembling or fabricating a gun suppressor, and any part intended only for use in such assembly or fabrication.

“Sport shooting range” shall have the same meaning as used in 10 V.S.A. § 5227(a).

A person shall not manufacture, make, or import a gun suppressor, except for:

a licensed manufacturer, as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 921, who is registered as a manufacturer pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 5802;

a licensed importer, as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 921, who is registered as an importer pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 5802; or

a person who makes a gun suppressor in compliance with the requirements of 26 U.S.C. § 5822.

A person shall not use a gun suppressor in the State, except for use by:

a Level III certified law enforcement officer or Department of Fish and Wildlife employee in connection with his or her duties and responsibilities and in accordance with the policies and procedures of that officer’s or employee’s agency or department;

the Vermont National Guard in connection with its duties and responsibilities;

a licensed manufacturer or a licensed importer, as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 921, who is also registered as a manufacturer or an importer pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 5802, who in the ordinary course of his or her business as a manufacturer or as an importer tests the operation of the gun suppressor; or

a person lawfully using a sport shooting range.

A person who violates subsection (b) of this section shall be fined not less than $500.00 for each offense.
(d) (1) A person who violates subsection (b) of this section shall be fined not less than $500.00 for each offense.

A person who violates subsection (c) of this section shall be fined $50.00 for each offense.

HISTORY:

Amended 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238f, eff. June 3, 2010; 2013, No. 141 (Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. July 1, 2015; 2015, No. 61, § 15, eff. July 2, 2015.

§ 4011.
Aiming gun at another.

Any person who shall intentionally point or aim any gun, pistol, or other firearm at or towards another, except in self-defense or in the lawful discharge of official duty, shall be punished by fine not exceeding $50.00.
Any person who shall discharge any such firearm so intentionally aimed or pointed shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one year or fined not more than $100.00, or both.

§ 4012.
Reporting treatment of firearm wounds.

Every physician attending or treating a case of bullet wound, gunshot wound, powder burn, or any other injury arising from or caused by the discharge of a gun, pistol, or other firearm, or whenever such case is treated in a hospital, sanitarium, or other institution, the manager, superintendent, or other person in charge shall report such case at once to local law enforcement officials or the State police. The provisions of this section shall not apply to such wounds, burns, or injuries received by a member of the armed forces of the United States or State of Vermont while engaged in the actual performance of duty.

A person violating the provisions of this section shall be fined not more than $100.00.

§ 4013.
Zip guns; switchblade knives.

A person who possesses, sells, or offers for sale a weapon commonly known as a “zip” gun, or a weapon commonly known as a switchblade knife, the blade of which is three inches or more in length, shall be imprisoned not more than 90 days or fined not more than $100.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1959, No. 151, eff. May 5, 1959; amended 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 4014.
Purchase of firearms in other states.

Residents of the State of Vermont may purchase rifles and shotguns in another state, provided that such residents conform to the applicable provisions of the Gun Control Act of 1968, and regulations thereunder, as administered by the U.S. Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, and provided further that such residents conform to the provisions of law applicable to such purchase in the State of Vermont and in the state in which the purchase is made.

HISTORY:

Added 1969, No. 108, § 1, eff. April 19, 1969; amended 2009, No. 54, § 86, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4015.
Purchase of firearms by nonresidents.

Residents of a state other than the State of Vermont may purchase rifles and shotguns in the State of Vermont, provided that such residents conform to the applicable provisions of the Gun Control Act of 1968, and regulations thereunder, as administered by the U.S. Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, and provided further that such residents conform to the provisions of law applicable to such purchase in the State of Vermont and in the state in which such persons reside.

HISTORY:

Added 1969, No. 108, § 2, eff. April 19, 1969; amended 2009, No. 54, § 87, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4016.
Weapons in court.

As used in this section:

“Courthouse” means a building or any portion of a building designated by the Supreme Court of Vermont as a courthouse.

“Dangerous or deadly weapon” means any firearm, or other weapon, device, instrument, material, or substance, whether animate or inanimate, that in the manner it is used or is intended to be used is known to be capable of producing death or serious bodily injury.

“Firearm” means any weapon, whether loaded or unloaded, that will expel a projectile by the action of an explosive and includes any weapon commonly referred to as a pistol, revolver, rifle, gun, machine gun, or shotgun.

“Law enforcement officer” means a person certified by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council as having satisfactorily completed the approved training programs required to meet the minimum training standards applicable to that person pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2358.

“Secured building” means a building with controlled points of public access, metal screening devices at each point of public access, and locked compartments, accessible only to security personnel, for storage of checked firearms.

A person who, while within a courthouse and without authorization from the court,

carries or has in his or her possession a firearm; or

knowingly carries or has in his or her possession a dangerous or deadly weapon, other than a firearm, shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

Notice of the provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall be posted conspicuously at each public entrance to each courthouse.

No dangerous or deadly weapon shall be allowed in a courthouse that has been certified by the Court Administrator to be a secured building.

HISTORY:

Added 1993, No. 45, § 1, eff. June 2, 1993.

§ 4017.
Persons prohibited from possessing firearms; conviction of violent crime.

A person shall not possess a firearm if the person has been convicted of a violent crime.

A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

This section shall not apply to a person who is exempt from federal firearms restrictions under 18 U.S.C. § 925(c).

As used in this section:

“Firearm” means:
(1) (A) “Firearm” means:

any weapon (including a starter gun) that will or is designed to or may readily be converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive;

the frame or receiver of any such weapon; or

any firearm muffler or firearm silencer.

“Firearm” shall not include an antique firearm.

“Antique firearm” means:

Any firearm (including any firearm with a matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system) manufactured in or before 1898.

Any replica of any firearm described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) if the replica:

is not designed or redesigned for using rimfire or conventional centerfire fixed ammunition; or

uses rimfire or conventional centerfire fixed ammunition that is no longer manufactured in the United States and that is not readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.

Any muzzle loading rifle, muzzle loading shotgun, or muzzle loading pistol that is designed to use black powder or a black powder substitute and that cannot use fixed ammunition. As used in this subdivision (C), “antique firearm” shall not include a weapon that incorporates a firearm frame or receiver, a firearm that is converted into a muzzle loading weapon, or any muzzle loading weapon that can be readily converted to fire fixed ammunition by replacing the barrel, bolt, breechblock, or any combination thereof.

“Violent crime” means:

A listed crime as defined in subdivision 5301(7) of this title other than:
(A) (i) A listed crime as defined in subdivision 5301(7) of this title other than:

lewd or lascivious conduct as defined in section 2601 of this title;

recklessly endangering another person as defined in section 1025 of this title;

operating a vehicle under the influence of alcohol or other substance with either death or serious bodily injury resulting as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 1210(f) and (g);

careless or negligent operation resulting in serious bodily injury or death as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 1091(b);

leaving the scene of an accident resulting in serious bodily injury or death as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 1128(b) or (c); or

a misdemeanor violation of chapter 28 of this title, relating to abuse, neglect, and exploitation of vulnerable adults; or

a comparable offense and sentence in another jurisdiction if the offense prohibits the person from possessing a firearm under 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(1) or 18 U.S.C. § 921(a)(20).

An offense involving sexual exploitation of children in violation of chapter 64 of this title, or a comparable offense and sentence in another jurisdiction if the offense prohibits the person from possessing a firearm under 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(1) or 18 U.S.C. § 921(a)(20).

A violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4231(b)(2), (b)(3), or (c)(selling, dispensing, or trafficking cocaine); 4232(b)(2) or (b)(3)(selling or dispensing LSD); 4233(b)(2), (b)(3), or (c)(selling, dispensing, or trafficking heroin); 4234(b)(2) or (b)(3)(selling or dispensing depressants, stimulants, and narcotics); 4234a(b)(2), (b)(3), or (c)(selling, dispensing, or trafficking methamphetamine); 4235(c)(2) or (c)(3)(selling or dispensing hallucinogenic drugs); 4235a(b)(2) or (b)(3)(selling or dispensing Ecstasy), or a comparable offense and sentence in another jurisdiction if the offense prohibits the person from possessing a firearm under 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(1) or 18 U.S.C. § 921(a)(20).

A conviction of possession with intent to distribute a controlled substance other than cannabis in another jurisdiction if the offense prohibits the person from possessing a firearm under 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(1) or 18 U.S.C. § 921(a)(20).

HISTORY:

Added 2015, No. 14, § 1; amended 2017, No. 83, § 161(3).

§ 4018.
Drones.

No person shall equip a drone with a dangerous or deadly weapon or fire a projectile from a drone. A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

As used in this section:

“Drone” shall have the same meaning as in 20 V.S.A. § 4621.

“Dangerous or deadly weapon” shall have the same meaning as in section 4016 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 2015, No. 169 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Oct. 1, 2016.

§ 4019.
Firearms transfers; background checks. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Firearm” shall have the same meaning as in subsection 4017(d) of this title.

“Immediate family member” means a spouse, parent, stepparent, child, stepchild, sibling, stepsibling, grandparent, step-grandparent, grandchild, step-grandchild, great-grandparent, step-great-grandparent, great-grandchild, and step-great-grandchild.

“Law enforcement officer” shall have the same meaning as in subdivision 4016(a)(4) of this title.

“Licensed dealer” means a person issued a license as a dealer in firearms pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 923(a).

“Proposed transferee” means an unlicensed person to whom a proposed transferor intends to transfer a firearm.

“Proposed transferor” means an unlicensed person who intends to transfer a firearm to another unlicensed person.

“Transfer” means to transfer ownership of a firearm by means of sale, trade, or gift.

“Unlicensed person” means a person who has not been issued a license as a dealer, importer, or manufacturer in firearms pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 923(a).

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, an unlicensed person shall not transfer a firearm to another unlicensed person unless:
(b) (1) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, an unlicensed person shall not transfer a firearm to another unlicensed person unless:

the proposed transferor and the proposed transferee physically appear together with the firearm before a licensed dealer and request that the licensed dealer facilitate the transfer; and

the licensed dealer agrees to facilitate the transfer.

A person shall not, in connection with the transfer or attempted transfer of a firearm pursuant to this section, knowingly make a false statement or exhibit a false identification intended to deceive a licensed dealer with respect to any fact material to the transfer.

A licensed dealer who agrees to facilitate a firearm transfer pursuant to this section shall comply with all requirements of State and federal law and shall, unless otherwise expressly provided in this section, conduct the transfer in the same manner as the licensed dealer would if selling the firearm from his or her own inventory, but shall not be considered a vendor.
(c) (1) A licensed dealer who agrees to facilitate a firearm transfer pursuant to this section shall comply with all requirements of State and federal law and shall, unless otherwise expressly provided in this section, conduct the transfer in the same manner as the licensed dealer would if selling the firearm from his or her own inventory, but shall not be considered a vendor.

A licensed dealer shall return the firearm to the proposed transferor and decline to continue facilitating the transfer if the licensed dealer determines that the proposed transferee is prohibited by federal or State law from purchasing or possessing the firearm.

A licensed dealer may charge a reasonable fee to facilitate the transfer of a firearm between a proposed transferor and a proposed transferee pursuant to this section.

An unlicensed person who transfers a firearm to another unlicensed person in violation of subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.
(d) (1) An unlicensed person who transfers a firearm to another unlicensed person in violation of subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

A person who violates subdivision (b)(2) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

This section shall not apply to:

the transfer of a firearm by or to a law enforcement agency;

the transfer of a firearm by or to a law enforcement officer or member of the U.S. Armed Forces acting within the course of his or her official duties;

the transfer of a firearm from one immediate family member to another immediate family member; or

a person who transfers the firearm to another person in order to prevent imminent harm to any person, provided that this subdivision shall only apply while the risk of imminent harm exists.

A licensed dealer who facilitates a firearm transfer pursuant to this section shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability for any actions taken or omissions made when facilitating the transfer in reliance on the provisions of this section. This subsection shall not apply to reckless or intentional misconduct by a licensed dealer.

HISTORY:

Added 2017, No. 94 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 11, 2018.

§ 4019.
Firearms transfers; background checks. [Effective July 1, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Firearm” shall have the same meaning as in subsection 4017(d) of this title.

“Immediate family member” means a spouse, parent, stepparent, child, stepchild, sibling, stepsibling, grandparent, step-grandparent, grandchild, step-grandchild, great-grandparent, step-great-grandparent, great-grandchild, and step-great-grandchild.

“Law enforcement officer” shall have the same meaning as in subdivision 4016(a)(4) of this title.

“Licensed dealer” means a person issued a license as a dealer in firearms pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 923(a).

“Proposed transferee” means an unlicensed person to whom a proposed transferor intends to transfer a firearm.

“Proposed transferor” means an unlicensed person who intends to transfer a firearm to another unlicensed person.

“Transfer” means to transfer ownership of a firearm by means of sale, trade, or gift.

“Unlicensed person” means a person who has not been issued a license as a dealer, importer, or manufacturer in firearms pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 923(a).

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, an unlicensed person shall not transfer a firearm to another unlicensed person unless:
(b) (1) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, an unlicensed person shall not transfer a firearm to another unlicensed person unless:

the proposed transferor and the proposed transferee physically appear together with the firearm before a licensed dealer and request that the licensed dealer facilitate the transfer; and

the licensed dealer agrees to facilitate the transfer.

A person shall not, in connection with the transfer or attempted transfer of a firearm pursuant to this section, knowingly make a false statement or exhibit a false identification intended to deceive a licensed dealer with respect to any fact material to the transfer.

A licensed dealer who agrees to facilitate a firearm transfer pursuant to this section shall comply with all requirements of State and federal law and shall, unless otherwise expressly provided in this section, conduct the transfer in the same manner as the licensed dealer would if selling the firearm from his or her own inventory, but shall not be considered a vendor.
(c) (1) A licensed dealer who agrees to facilitate a firearm transfer pursuant to this section shall comply with all requirements of State and federal law and shall, unless otherwise expressly provided in this section, conduct the transfer in the same manner as the licensed dealer would if selling the firearm from his or her own inventory, but shall not be considered a vendor.

A licensed dealer shall return the firearm to the proposed transferor and decline to continue facilitating the transfer if the licensed dealer determines that the proposed transferee is prohibited by federal or State law from purchasing or possessing the firearm.

A licensed dealer may charge a reasonable fee to facilitate the transfer of a firearm between a proposed transferor and a proposed transferee pursuant to this section.

A person shall not transfer a firearm to another person if:

the transfer requires a background check under this section or under federal law; and

the licensed dealer facilitating the transfer has not been provided with a unique identification number for the transfer by the National Instant Criminal Background Check System, provided that if the identification number has not been provided within seven business days, then the transfer may proceed.

An unlicensed person who transfers a firearm to another unlicensed person in violation of subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.
(e) (1) An unlicensed person who transfers a firearm to another unlicensed person in violation of subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

A person who violates subdivision (b)(2) or subsection (d) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

This section shall not apply to:

the transfer of a firearm by or to a law enforcement agency;

the transfer of a firearm by or to a law enforcement officer or member of the U.S. Armed Forces acting within the course of the officer’s or the U.S. Armed Forces member’s official duties;

the transfer of a firearm from one immediate family member to another immediate family member; or

a person who transfers the firearm to another person in order to prevent imminent harm to any person, provided that this subdivision shall only apply while the risk of imminent harm exists.

A licensed dealer who facilitates a firearm transfer pursuant to this section shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability for any actions taken or omissions made when facilitating the transfer in reliance on the provisions of this section. This subsection shall not apply to reckless or intentional misconduct by a licensed dealer.

HISTORY:

Added 2017, No. 94 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 11, 2018; 2021 87, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 4020.
Sale of firearms to persons under 21 years of age prohibited.

A person shall not sell a firearm to a person under 21 years of age. A person who violates this subsection shall be imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

This section shall not apply to:

a law enforcement officer;

an active or veteran member of the Vermont National Guard, of the National Guard of another state, or of the U.S. Armed Forces;

a person who provides the seller with a certificate of satisfactory completion of a Vermont hunter safety course or an equivalent hunter safety course that is approved by the Commissioner; or

a person who provides the seller with a certificate of satisfactory completion of a hunter safety course in another state or a province of Canada that is approved by the Commissioner.

As used in this section:

“Firearm” shall have the same meaning as in subsection 4017(d) of this title.

“Law enforcement officer” shall have the same meaning as in subsection 4016(a) of this title.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife.

HISTORY:

Added 2017, No. 94 (Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 11, 2018.

§ 4021.
Large capacity ammunition feeding devices. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

A person shall not manufacture, possess, transfer, offer for sale, purchase, or receive or import into this State a large capacity ammunition feeding device. As used in this subsection, “import” shall not include the transportation back into this State of a large capacity ammunition feeding device by the same person who transported the device out of State if the person possessed the device on or before the effective date of this section.

A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

The prohibition on possession of large capacity ammunition feeding devices established by subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to a large capacity ammunition feeding device lawfully possessed on or before the effective date of this section.
(c) (1) The prohibition on possession of large capacity ammunition feeding devices established by subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to a large capacity ammunition feeding device lawfully possessed on or before the effective date of this section.

The prohibition on possession, transfer, sale, and purchase of large capacity ammunition feeding devices established by subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to a large capacity ammunition feeding device lawfully possessed by a licensed dealer as defined in subdivision 4019(a)(4) of this title prior to April 11, 2018 and transferred by the dealer on or before October 1, 2018.

This section shall not apply to any large capacity ammunition feeding device:
(d) (1) This section shall not apply to any large capacity ammunition feeding device:

manufactured for, transferred to, or possessed by the United States or a department or agency of the United States, or by any state or by a department, agency, or political subdivision of a state;

transferred to or possessed by a federal law enforcement officer or a law enforcement officer certified as a law enforcement officer by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2358, for legitimate law enforcement purposes, whether the officer is on or off duty;

transferred to a licensee under Title I of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954 for purposes of establishing and maintaining an on-site physical protection system and security organization required by federal law, or possessed by an employee or contractor of such a licensee on-site for these purposes, or off-site for purposes of licensee-authorized training or transportation of nuclear materials;

possessed by an individual who is retired from service with a law enforcement agency after having been transferred to the individual by the agency upon his or her retirement, provided that the individual is not otherwise prohibited from receiving ammunition;

manufactured, imported, transferred, or possessed by a manufacturer or importer licensed under 18 U.S.C. chapter 44:

for the purposes of testing or experimentation authorized by the U.S. Attorney General, or for product development;

for repair and return to the person from whom it was received; or

for transfer in foreign or domestic commerce for delivery and possession outside the State of Vermont; or

[Repealed.]

This section shall not apply to a licensed dealer as defined in subdivision 4019(a)(4) of this title for the sole purpose of transferring or selling a large capacity ammunition feeding device to a person to whom this section does not apply under subdivision (1) of this subsection (d).

As used in this section, “large capacity ammunition feeding device” means a magazine, belt, drum, feed strip, or similar device that has a capacity of, or that can be readily restored or converted to accept:
(e) (1) As used in this section, “large capacity ammunition feeding device” means a magazine, belt, drum, feed strip, or similar device that has a capacity of, or that can be readily restored or converted to accept:

more than 10 rounds of ammunition for a long gun; or

more than 15 rounds of ammunition for a hand gun.

The term “large capacity ammunition feeding device” shall not include:

an attached tubular device designed to accept, and capable of operating only with, .22 caliber rimfire ammunition;

a large capacity ammunition feeding device that is manufactured or sold solely for use by a lever action or bolt action long gun or by an antique firearm as defined in subdivisions 4017(d)(2)(A) and (B) of this title; or

a large capacity ammunition feeding device that is manufactured or sold solely for use with a firearm that is determined to be a curio or relic by the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives. As used in this subdivision, “curio or relic” means a firearm that is of special interest to collectors by reason of some quality other than its association with firearms intended for sporting use or as offensive or defensive weapons.

HISTORY:

Added 2017, No. 94 (Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. April 11, 2018; amended 2017, No. 94 (Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. July 1, 2019.

§ 4021.
Large capacity ammunition feeding devices. [Effective July 1, 2022]

A person shall not manufacture, possess, transfer, offer for sale, purchase, or receive or import into this State a large capacity ammunition feeding device. As used in this subsection, “import” does not include the transportation back into this State of a large capacity ammunition feeding device by the same person who transported the device out of State if the person possessed the device on or before the effective date of this section.

A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

The prohibition on possession of large capacity ammunition feeding devices established by subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to a large capacity ammunition feeding device lawfully possessed on or before the effective date of this section.
(c) (1) The prohibition on possession of large capacity ammunition feeding devices established by subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to a large capacity ammunition feeding device lawfully possessed on or before the effective date of this section.

The prohibition on possession, transfer, sale, and purchase of large capacity ammunition feeding devices established by subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to a large capacity ammunition feeding device lawfully possessed by a licensed dealer as defined in subdivision 4019(a)(4) of this title prior to April 11, 2018 and transferred by the dealer on or before October 1, 2018.

This section shall not apply to any large capacity ammunition feeding device:
(d) (1) This section shall not apply to any large capacity ammunition feeding device:

manufactured for, transferred to, or possessed by the United States or a department or agency of the United States, or by any state or by a department, agency, or political subdivision of a state;

transferred to or possessed by a federal law enforcement officer or a law enforcement officer certified as a law enforcement officer by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2358, for legitimate law enforcement purposes, whether the officer is on or off duty;

transferred to a licensee under Title I of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954 for purposes of establishing and maintaining an on-site physical protection system and security organization required by federal law, or possessed by an employee or contractor of such a licensee on-site for these purposes, or off-site for purposes of licensee-authorized training or transportation of nuclear materials;

possessed by an individual who is retired from service with a law enforcement agency after having been transferred to the individual by the agency upon his or her retirement, provided that the individual is not otherwise prohibited from receiving ammunition;

manufactured, imported, transferred, or possessed by a manufacturer or importer licensed under 18 U.S.C. chapter 44:

for the purposes of testing or experimentation authorized by the U.S. Attorney General, or for product development;

for repair and return to the person from whom it was received; or

for transfer in foreign or domestic commerce for delivery and possession outside the State of Vermont; or

transported by a resident of another state into this State for the exclusive purpose of use in an organized shooting competition sponsored by an entity registered with the Secretary of State if the device is lawfully possessed under the laws of another state.

This section shall not apply to a licensed dealer as defined in subdivision 4019(a)(4) of this title for the sole purpose of transferring or selling a large capacity ammunition feeding device to a person to whom this section does not apply under subdivision (1) of this subsection (d).

As used in this section, “large capacity ammunition feeding device” means a magazine, belt, drum, feed strip, or similar device that has a capacity of, or that can be readily restored or converted to accept:
(e) (1) As used in this section, “large capacity ammunition feeding device” means a magazine, belt, drum, feed strip, or similar device that has a capacity of, or that can be readily restored or converted to accept:

more than 10 rounds of ammunition for a long gun; or

more than 15 rounds of ammunition for a hand gun.

The term “large capacity ammunition feeding device” shall not include:

an attached tubular device designed to accept, and capable of operating only with, .22 caliber rimfire ammunition;

a large capacity ammunition feeding device that is manufactured or sold solely for use by a lever action or bolt action long gun or by an antique firearm as defined in subdivisions 4017(d)(2)(A) and (B) of this title; or

a large capacity ammunition feeding device that is manufactured or sold solely for use with a firearm that is determined to be a curio or relic by the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives. As used in this subdivision, “curio or relic” means a firearm that is of special interest to collectors by reason of some quality other than its association with firearms intended for sporting use or as offensive or defensive weapons.

HISTORY:

Added 2017, No. 94 (Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. April 11, 2018; amended 2017, No. 94 (Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. July 1, 2019; 2021 87, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 4022.
Bump-fire stocks; possession prohibited.

As used in this section, “bump-fire stock” means a butt stock designed to be attached to a semiautomatic firearm and intended to increase the rate of fire achievable with the firearm to that of a fully automatic firearm by using the energy from the recoil of the firearm to generate a reciprocating action that facilitates the repeated activation of the trigger.

A person shall not possess a bump-fire stock. A person who violates this subsection shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

The Department of Public Safety shall develop, promote, and execute a collection process that permits persons to voluntarily and anonymously relinquish bump-fire stocks prior to the effective date of this section.

HISTORY:

Added 2017, No. 94 (Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. Oct. 1, 2018.